Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-316
Estimate of benefits to highways and railroad property; how determined.

The benefits to public streets and highways, railroad property, right-of-way and roadbed, shall be assessed according to the increased efficiency and value added thereto by reason of, and the protection derived from, the aforesaid drainage works and improvements.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 9, p. 614;

Laws 1909, c. 147, § 3, p. 510;

R.S.1913, § 1811;

C.S.1922, § 1758;

C.S.1929, § 31-415;

R.S.1943, § 31-316.

Benefits accruing to railroad by drainage of flood waters may be assessed by drainage district. Rudersdorf Drainage District v. Chicago, R. I. & P. Ry. Co., 118 Neb. 43, 223 N.W. 639 (1929); Missouri Pacific Railroad Company v. Drainage District No. 5 of Richardson County, 110 Neb. 762, 195 N.W. 113 (1923).